Resources/ta_IN.aff
# கொள் - டேன்-வேன்
SFX X Y 962
SFX X   0     ள/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தாய்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தீர்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தீர்கள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தான்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தாள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தார்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தார்கள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தது/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்தன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கிறன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்கின்றன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்வார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளச்செய்யும்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவை/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தாய்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தீர்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தீர்கள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தான்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தாள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தார்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தார்கள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தது/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைத்தன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கிறன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்போம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவைப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவைக்கும்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தாய்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தீர்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தீர்கள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தான்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தாள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தார்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தார்கள்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தது/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்த்தன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கிறன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கின்றன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்போம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்ப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்பார்க்கும்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவா/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தாள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தார்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தது/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவந்தன/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருகிறன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருகின்றன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருவேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருவோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவருவாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருவீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருவான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவருவாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருவார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவருவார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவரும்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போ/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனாள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனார்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனார்கள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போனது/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போயிற்று/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போயின/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகிறன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகின்றன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளப்போவார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளப்போகும்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிரு/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தாள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தார்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தது/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருந்தன/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கிறன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்போம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவிருப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவிருக்கும்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிரு/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தாள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தார்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தது/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருந்தன/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கிறன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருப்பேன்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருப்போம்/y       .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருப்பாய்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருப்பீர்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருப்பான்/y         .
SFX X   0     ளவேண்டியிருப்பாள்/y        .
